src-fst-morphology-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# Mansi Noun stems

## The continuation lexica

Explaining the contlex naming convention:
- V = Vowel, C = Consonant
- VCH = short hard consonant, CS = soft consonant (ь, щ, ч, й)
- VCCH = hard consonant cluster, CS = soft consonant cluster (all the rest)
- VI = high vowel и, ы; VO = low or round vowel (all the rest)
- SYN = synchopy, NOSYN = no synchopy (even though it seemingly should have it)

This gives us the following stem types:

- N_NOSYNCH = а̄рсын
- N_NOSYNCS = а̄гирищ
- N_SYNCH   = а̄пыр
- N_SYNCS   = а̄мыщ
- N_VCCH    = а̄гм. класс
- N_VCCS    = ансамбль
- N_VCH     = а̄врах
- N_VCS     = а̄кань
- N_VI      = а̄ви
- N_VO      = а̄ква
- If the words are homographs of the Russian Nominative Singular, the additional
_rus100 segment is added, e.g., буква+N:буква N_VO_rus100

## The lexicon entries

**LEXICON Nouns** gives all the nouns, contlex **N1_**, regardless of stem form (V-, C- final, palatal or not, syllable number). Here some random example entries:

new nouns from translative case attestation. Csilla check nouns below. 20230522

* а̄вгуст+N:а̄вгуст N_VCCH "август" ;!dublet?
* а̄ви+N:а̄ви N_VI "вход /место/" ;
* а̄врах+N:а̄врах N_VCH "обрыв" ;!dublet?
* а̄втор+N:а̄втор N_VCH "автор" ;
* а̄ги+v1+N:а̄ги N_VI "дочь" ;
* а̄ги+v2+N:аги N_VI "дочь" ;
* а̄гирищ+v1+N:а̄гирищ N_NOSYNCS "девочка" ; CHECKME
* а̄гм+N:а̄гм N_VCCH "боль" ; CHECKME
* а̄гум+N:а̄гум N_SYNCH "болезнь" ;
* а̄кань+N:а̄кань N_VCS "кукла" ;
* а̄кв+N:а̄кв N_VCCH "тётя" ; Compare consonant-final!dublet?
* а̄ква+N:а̄ква N_VO "тётя" ; Compare vowel-final!dublet?
* аквщос+N:аквщос N_VCH ; CHECKME
* а̄мп+N:а̄мп N_VCCH "собака" ;
* а̄ӈквпыг+N:а̄ӈкв#пыг N_NOSYNCH "брат /двоюродный//по материнской линии/" ; CHECKME
* а̄па+N:а̄па N_VO "люлька" ;!dublet?
* а̄рталь+N:а̄рталь N_VCS "семья" ;
* а̄ртмил+N:а̄ртмил N_VCH "удача" ;
* вла̄сть+v1+N:вла̄сть N_VCCS "власть" ; CHECKME
* голубь+N:голубь N_VCS "голубь" ; CHECKME
* ласка+N:ласка N_VO "ласка /животное/" ;
* ласточка+N:ласточка N_VO "ласточка" ;
* тушь+N:тушь N_VCS "тушь" ; CHECKME

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
